Hawaii, session 2025, GM1104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 712-1241, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
" (1) A person commits the offense of promoting a dangerous
drug in the first degree if the person knowingly:
Possesses one or more preparations. compounds,
mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of:
(i) One ounce or more, containing methamphetamine.
heroin, morphine. fentanyl, or cocaine or any of
their respective salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers; or
(ii) One and one-half ounce or more containing one or
more of any of the other dangerous drugs;
(b) Distributes;
(i) Twenty-five or more capsules, tablets, ampules.
dosage units, or syrettes containing one or more
dangerous drugs; or
HB LRB 25-0355.docx
■■■imiiHi

Page 2 H.B. NO.
(ii) One or more preparations, compounds, mixtures, or
substances of an aggregate weight of:
(A) One-eighth ounce or more, containing
methamphetamine, heroin, morphine, fentanyl,
or cocaine or any of their respective salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers; or
(B) Three-eighths ounce or more, containing any
other dangerous drug;
(c) Distributes any dangerous drug in any amount to a
minor except for methamphetamine; or
(d) Manufactures a dangerous drug in any amount, except
for methamphetamine; provided that this subsection
shall not apply to any person registered under
section 329-32 ."
SECTION 2. Section 712-1242, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
"(1 ) A person commits the offense of promoting a dangerous
drug in the second degree if the person knowingly:
(a) Possesses twenty-five or more capsules, tablets,
ampules, dosage units, or syrettes, containing one or
more dangerous drugs;
HB LRB 25-0355.docx 2
■■■■■■■I

Page 3 H.B, NO. 5K
(b) Possesses one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances of an aggregate weight of:
(i) One-eighth ounce or more, containing
methamphetamine, heroin, morphine, fentanyl, or
cocaine or any of their respective salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers; or
(ii) One-fourth ounce or more, containing any
dangerous drug; or
(c) Distributes any dangerous drug in any amount."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
HB LRB 25-0355.docx 3

Page 4 H.B. NO.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

INTRODUCED BY:
By Request
JAN 1 6 2025
HB LRB 25-0355.docx
HiiiaiiiiiiifmiJi

386
H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 10th day of April 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 386
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: February 28, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: MARZ 7 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
Senate of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Carol T. Taniguchi
Clerk of the Senate